Idaho, session 2026, H0496.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 6, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. That Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 6, Title 54, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 6
PODIATRIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT
54-601. PODIATRY DEFINED. (1) Podiatry shall, for the purpose of this
chapter, mean the diagnosis and mechanical, electrical, medical, physical,
and surgical treatment of ailments of the human foot and leg and the casting
of feet for the purpose of preparing or prescribing corrective appliances,
prosthetics, or custom orthopedic shoes for corrective treatment; how-
ever, the casting of feet for preparing corrective appliances, prosthetics,
or custom orthopedic shoes may be permitted on the prescription of a duly
licensed person in the healing arts in this state. Podiatrists shall be
limited in their practice to the human foot and leg. Surgical treatment,
as herein used, shall mean the surgical treatment of the foot and ankle and
those soft tissue structures below the knee governing the function of the
foot and ankle, but it shall not include the amputation of the leg, surgery of
the knee joint, surgery of the bony structures proximal to the distal half of
the tibia, or the administration or monitoring of general anesthesia.


(2) Advanced surgical procedures, as determined by the state board of
medicine, shall be performed in a licensed hospital or certified ambulatory
surgical center accredited by the joint commission or the accreditation as-
sociation for ambulatory health care where a peer review system is in place.
(3) A podiatrist may administer narcotics and medications in the treat-
ment of ailments of the human foot and leg in the same manner as a physician
licensed to practice pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code.
(4) A podiatrist is defined as a natural person who practices podiatry
within the scope of this chapter and shall be referred to as a podiatric
physician and surgeon. Nothing within this chapter shall prohibit any
physician or surgeon, registered and licensed as such and authorized to
practice under the laws of the state of Idaho, or any physician or surgeon of
the United States army, navy, or public health service when in actual perfor-
mance of his duties from practicing medicine and surgery.
54-602. LICENSE A PREREQUISITE TO PRACTICE. It is unlawful for any
person to practice podiatry unless licensed to do so as provided in this
chapter.
54-603. POWERS AND DUTIES OF STATE BOARD OF MEDICINE. (1) The state
board of medicine, herein referred to as the board, shall have the following
powers and duties:
(a) To designate examinations to ascertain the qualifications and fit-
ness of applicants to practice podiatry; to pass upon the qualifica-
tions of applicants for licenses by endorsement; and to establish, by
rule, the specific examinations to be required of each applicant for li-
censure;
(b) To prescribe rules, subject to legislative approval, defining for
the podiatrists what shall constitute a reputable school, college or
university, or department of a university or other institution in good
standing and to determine such reputability of good standing by refer-
ence to compliance with such rules;
(c) To conduct hearings and proceedings for discipline of licensees as
set forth in this chapter;
(d) To make and promulgate rules, subject to legislative approval,
prescribing the standards for the ethical practice of podiatry in the
state;
(e) To make and promulgate rules, subject to legislative approval,
defining and requiring a podiatric residency as a condition of licen-
sure; and
(f) To prescribe the fees required by this chapter in board rule, sub-
ject to legislative approval.
(2) Rules regarding the practice of podiatry that are in effect on July
1, 2026, shall remain in effect as if promulgated by the board of medicine and
may be amended as necessary by the board of medicine consistent with chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code, subject to legislative approval.
54-604. APPLICATION AND EXAMINATION FOR LICENSE. (1) Every person,
except as hereinafter provided, desiring to practice podiatry within this
state shall make application to the board in the form designated by the


board. Such application shall be accompanied by a fee as established by
board rule, not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400).
(2) Each applicant shall:
(a) Not have been convicted or found guilty in this state or in any other
state of a crime that is deemed relevant in accordance with the provi-
sions of section 67-9411(1), Idaho Code;
(b) Submit to a fingerprint-based criminal history background check in
accordance with the provisions of section 67-9411A, Idaho Code;
(c) Be a graduate of a school of podiatry approved by the board; and
(d) Have completed an accredited podiatric residency as defined by
board rule.
(3) Each applicant shall take and pass a competency exam approved by
board rule. The examination shall test for entry-level competency to pro-
vide podiatric medical services.
(4) The examination fee shall not exceed the amount charged by the
board-approved exam provider. The applicant shall pay the examination fee
directly to the exam provider.
54-605. LICENSES -- ISSUANCE -- RENEWALS. (1) If an applicant passes a
satisfactory examination and shows that he is a person who has not been con-
victed or found guilty in this state or in any other state of a crime that is
deemed relevant in accordance with section 67-9411(1), Idaho Code, and that
he possesses the qualifications of a licensed podiatrist required by this
chapter, he shall be entitled to a license authorizing him to practice podi-
atry within the state of Idaho. The successful applicant shall be issued a
license by the division of occupational and professional licenses upon pay-
ment of the original license fee, which shall be established by board rule
and shall not exceed the renewal fee.
(2) The board shall keep on file a register of all applicants for li-
cense, rejected applicants, and licensees.
54-606. LICENSES -- GROUNDS FOR SUSPENSION, DENIAL, REFUSAL TO RENEW,
OR REVOCATION. No license may be issued, and a license previously issued may
be suspended, revoked, or otherwise disciplined, if the person applying or
the person licensed is:
(1) Found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction of a crime that is
deemed relevant in accordance with section 67-9411(1), Idaho Code;
(2) Found by the board to be a repeated and excessive abuser of any drug,
including alcohol, or any controlled substance;
(3) Found by the board to be in violation of any provision of this chap-
ter or the rules promulgated pursuant thereto;
(4) Found by the board to have used fraud or deception in the procuring
of any license;
(5) Found by the board to have had any action, including denial of a li-
cense or the voluntary surrender of or voluntary limitation on a license,
taken against the licensee by any peer review body, any health care insti-
tution, any professional medical society or association, or any court, law
enforcement, or governmental agency;
(6) Found by the board to have been unethical or unprofessional in the
practice of healing the sick; or


(7) Found by the board to have failed to cooperate in a board investiga-
tion or to comply with a board order.
54-607. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT DEFINED. It shall constitute unpro-
fessional conduct justifying suspension, revocation, or other discipline of
a license for any person holding a license to practice podiatry to:
(1) Offer, give, or promise, either directly or indirectly, any gift in
return for the procurement of a patient or patients for podiatric treatment;
(2) Request, list, accept, or receive any rebates or commission for
prescribing or recommending any footwear, drug, medicine, or any other ar-
ticle, to his patients;
(3) Prescribe, dispense, or pretend to use, in treating any patient,
any secret remedial agent, or manifest or promote its use in any way, or guar-
antee or imply to guarantee any treatment, therapy, or remedy whatsoever;
(4) Use any form of advertising that is false, misleading, or decep-
tive;
(5) Use any title other than that of podiatrist or doctor of podiatric
medicine. The term "foot specialist" or "physician and surgeon of the feet"
may be used as explanatory terms of the title podiatrist but not alone or as a
substitute therefor;
(6) Employ a solicitor or solicitors to obtain business;
(7) Publish or use untruthful or improbable statements with the intent
of deceiving or defrauding the public or any patient; or
(8) Violate any rule promulgated by the board that prescribes the stan-
dards for the ethical practice of podiatry in this state.
54-608. PROCEEDINGS FOR SUSPENSION, REVOCATION, OR OTHER DISCIPLINE
OF LICENSE. (1) Proceedings for the suspension, revocation, or other disci-
pline of a license shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(2) The board shall have the power to administer oaths, take deposi-
tions of witnesses within or without the state in the manner provided by law
in civil cases, and, throughout the state of Idaho, to require the attendance
of such witnesses and the production of such books, records, and papers as
it may desire, relevant to any hearing before it of any matter that it has
authority to investigate, and for that purpose, the board may issue a sub-
poena for any witness or a subpoena duces tecum to compel the production of
books, records, or papers, directed to the sheriff of any county of the state
of Idaho where such witness resides or may be found, which shall be served
and returned in the same manner as a subpoena in a criminal case. Fees and
mileage of the witnesses shall be the same as that allowed in the district
courts in criminal cases and shall be paid from any funds in the state trea-
sury in the same manner as other expenses of the board are paid. In the event
of disobedience to or neglect of any subpoena or subpoena duces tecum served
on any person, or the refusal of any witness to testify to any matter regard-
ing which he may be lawfully interrogated, it shall be the duty of the dis-
trict court of any county in this state in which such disobedience, neglect,
or refusal occurs, or any judge thereof, upon application by the board, to
compel obedience by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience
of the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or for refusal to


testify therein. The licensed person accused shall have the same right of
subpoena upon making application to the board therefor.
(3) If the board finds that the licensed person accused has violated any
of the provisions of this chapter, the board may enter an order that includes
one (1) or more of the following:
(a) Revoking the respondent's license to practice podiatric medicine;
(b) Suspending or restricting the respondent's license to practice po-
diatric medicine;
(c) Imposing conditions or probation on the respondent's license, in-
cluding requiring rehabilitation or remediation;
(d) Issuing a public reprimand;
(e) Imposing an administrative fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars
($10,000) for each count or offense; or
(f) Assessing costs and attorney's fees against the respondent for any
investigation, administrative proceeding, or both.
54-609. LICENSE BY ENDORSEMENT. The board may issue a license to an ap-
plicant by endorsement where the applicant has passed an examination for and
is currently licensed to practice podiatry in another state. The applicant
must satisfy in all other respects the requirements for licensure in this
chapter and any rules adopted by the board. All applications for licensure
by endorsement must be accompanied by an application fee as established by
board rule.
54-610. PRACTICE WITHOUT A LICENSE A FELONY. Any person who practices
or attempts to practice podiatry, who publicly advertises as a podiatrist,
who uses the title chiropodist, podiatrist, or any other word, title, or ab-
breviation calculated to induce belief that he is engaged in the practice of
podiatry, or who holds himself out to the public as diagnosing the ailments
of or treating in any manner the human foot by medical, physical, or surgical
methods without a license as provided in this chapter shall be deemed guilty
of a felony.
SECTION 3. That Section 54-1805, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1805. THE STATE BOARD OF MEDICINE ESTABLISHED. (1) There is hereby
established in the division of occupational and professional licenses a
state board of medicine to be composed of eleven (11) members.
(2)(a) The board shall consist of eleven (11) members. The director
of the Idaho state police or the director's designated agent shall be a
member of the board. Seven (7) members shall be physicians who are res-
idents of this state and engaged in the active practice of medicine in
this state, two (2) members shall be public members, and one (1) member
shall be a physician assistant who is a resident of this state and en-
gaged in the active practice of medicine in this state.
(b) All physician and physician assistant appointments to the board
shall be for a single six (6) year term. The physician members shall
consist of six (6) members who are licensed to practice medicine in
this state and one (1) member who is licensed to practice osteopathic
medicine in this state. The physician assistant member shall be


licensed to practice medicine in this state. Whenever a term of a mem-
ber of the board who is licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic
medicine expires or becomes vacant, the governor shall consider rec-
ommendations provided by professional organizations of physicians and
physician assistants and by any individual residing in this state for
appointment.
(c) All public members shall be appointed by the governor for three (3)
year terms. Public members must reside in the state and be persons of
integrity and good reputation who have lived in this state for at least
five (5) years immediately preceding their appointment, who have never
been authorized to practice a healing art, and who have never had a sub-
stantial personal, business, professional, or pecuniary connection
with a healing art or with a medical education or health care facility,
except as patients or potential patients.
(2)(a) Six (6) members shall be physicians who are licensed and engaged
in the active practice of medicine in this state, one (1) member shall
be licensed and engaged in the active practice of osteopathic medicine
in this state, one (1) member shall be licensed and engaged in the active
practice of podiatric medicine in this state, one (1) member shall be a
physician assistant who is licensed and engaged in the active practice
of medicine in this state, and two (2) members shall be public members.
(b) All members of the board shall be residents of this state.
(c) All members of the board shall be appointed by the governor for five
(5) year terms and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.
(d) Public members must be persons of integrity and good reputation who
have lived in this state for at least five (5) years immediately pre-
ceding their appointment, who have never been authorized to practice a
healing art, and who have never had a substantial personal, business,
professional, or pecuniary connection with a healing art or with a med-
ical education or health care facility, except as patients or potential
patients.
(3) Appointments to fill vacancies occurring from some other reason
than expiration of a term for which a member was appointed shall be made in
the same manner as hereinabove set forth for the unexpired term. All board
members shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.
(4) The board shall elect a chairman from its membership. The members
of the board, except for state employees, shall be compensated as provided
by section 59-509(p), Idaho Code. Six (6) members of the board shall consti-
tute a quorum, and the board may act by virtue of a majority vote of members
present at a meeting.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-1395, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-1395. PRACTICE OF PODIATRY -- MEDICAL STAFF MEMBERSHIP. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, no provision or provisions of this sec-
tion shall in any way change or modify the authority or power of the governing
body of any hospital to make such rules, standards or qualifications for med-
ical staff membership as they, in their discretion, may deem necessary or ad-
visable, or to grant or refuse membership on a medical staff.


An applicant for medical staff membership may not be denied membership
solely on the ground that the applicant holds a license to practice podiatry
issued by the Idaho state board of podiatry medicine. The criteria utilized
for granting medical staff membership shall be reasonable and shall not dis-
criminate against podiatry.
The process for considering applications for medical staff membership
and privileges shall afford each applicant due process.
All applications for medical staff membership shall be acted upon on
within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date the required information
is submitted.
The accordance and delineation of clinical privileges for podiatrists
shall be determined on an individual basis and commensurate with the appli-
cant's education, training, experience and demonstrated competence. In im-
plementing these procedures, each hospital shall formulate and apply rea-
sonable standards that do not discriminate in the evaluation of an appli-
cant's credentials.
A member of the medical staff licensed pursuant to chapter 18, title 54,
Idaho Code, shall have responsibility for the overall medical care of the pa-
tient while in the hospital. Arrangements for the services of a member of the
medical staff licensed pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, for the
purposes of this section shall be the sole responsibility of the admitting
podiatrist and not that of the hospital or any other member of the medical
staff.
SECTION 5. That Section 54-4401, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-4401. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Board" means:
(a) The state board of podiatry as established in chapter 6, title 54,
Idaho Code;
(b) (a) The state board of chiropractic physicians as established in
chapter 7, title 54, Idaho Code;
(c) (b) The state board of dentistry as established in chapter 9, title
54, Idaho Code;
(d) (c) The state board of nursing as established in chapter 14, title
54, Idaho Code;
(e) (d) The state board of optometry as established in chapter 15, title
54, Idaho Code;
(f) (e) The state board of pharmacy as established in chapter 17, title
54, Idaho Code;
(g) (f) The state board of medicine as established in chapter 18, title
54, Idaho Code;
(h) (g) The board of veterinary medicine as established in chapter 21,
title 54, Idaho Code;
(i) (h) The Idaho state board of psychologist examiners as established
in chapter 23, title 54, Idaho Code;
(j) (i) The state board of social work examiners as established in chap-
ter 32, title 54, Idaho Code;
(k) (j) The Idaho state counselor licensing board as established in
chapter 34, title 54, Idaho Code; and


(l) (k) Any health care related board granted licensing authority by
the legislature after July 1, 1993.
(2) "Peer assistance entity" means an organization, a program, a com-
mittee or a professional association which that is designed to address any
or all of the following issues affecting practitioners of the health care
professions: chemical dependency and/or impairment; psychological impair-
ment; and mental or physical impairment.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.